District of Columbia statutes.
4-206.05

Emergency shelter allowances.

The Mayor, in providing emergency shelter allowances to families who are receiving TANF to enable them to obtain public housing, may claim federal financial participation to the extent allowable by law, provided the family has not received assistance from any emergency program for more than 30 consecutive days within the last 12 months.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 605, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-192, § 3(d), 43 DCR 4285
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(xx), 46 DCR 905
For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 2 to 5 of District of Columbia State of Emergency Disaster, Relocation, and Recovery Assistance Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-180, October 4, 2005, 52 DCR 9082).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(xx) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(xx) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(xx) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(xx) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(o) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(o) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), and § 2(o) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(d) of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-36, April 11, 1995, 42 DCR 1839), § 3(d) of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-105, July 21, 1995, 42 DCR 4019), § 3(d) of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-425, October 28, 1996, 43 DCR 6141), § 3(d) of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-485, January 2, 1997, 44 DCR 630), and § 3(d) of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-42, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2091).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(xx) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(o) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(o) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(d) of Emergency Assistance Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-24, July 14, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 3830).
1981 Ed., § 3-206.5.
Hospitals and asylums, free clinical health services to person receiving assistance under this subchapter, see § 44-731.